Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB258.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 189.222 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the secretary of the
Transportation Cabinet in respect to highways which are a part of the state-
maintained system, by official order, may increase on designated highways or
portions thereof, the maximum height, length, and gross weight prescribed in KRS
189.221, if in the opinion of the secretary, the increased height, length, and weight
designated by him or her are justified by the strength, safety, and durability of the
designated highways, and the highways do not appear susceptible to unreasonable
and unusual damage by reason of the increases and the secretary may establish
reasonable classification of state maintained roads and fix a different maximum for
each classification. Any increase in the height, length, or width of any motor truck
or tractor semitrailer combinations or any other vehicle combinations including any
part of the body or load or designation of highways to be used by the vehicles, shall
not, in any way, exceed the federal law or regulations thereunder or jeopardize the
allotment or qualification for federal aid funds of the Commonwealth of Kentucky
or exceed the following dimensions and weights:
(a) 1. Height, for vehicles transporting motor vehicles, fourteen (14) feet; and
2. Height, for all other vehicles, thirteen and one-half (13-1/2) feet;
(b) Length, semitrailers, fifty-three (53) feet; trailers, twenty-eight (28) feet;
motor trucks, forty-five (45) feet, not to exceed two (2) trailers per truck
tractor;
(c) Weight, twenty thousand (20,000) pounds per single axle, with axles less than
forty-two (42) inches apart to be considered as a single axle; thirty-four
thousand (34,000) pounds on two (2) axles in tandem arrangement which are
spaced forty-two (42) inches or more apart and less than ninety-six (96)
Page 1 of 18
HB025810.100 - 1225 - XXXX 2/5/2026 3:04 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 258/GA
inches apart; forty-eight thousand (48,000) pounds on three (3) axles which
are spaced forty-two (42) inches or more apart and less than one hundred
twenty (120) inches apart. No single axle in any arrangement shall exceed
twenty thousand (20,000) pounds or seven hundred (700) pounds per inch of
the aggregate width of all the tires on a single axle, whichever is less. The
total gross weight of the vehicle and load shall not exceed eighty thousand
(80,000) pounds;
(d) Except on the interstate highway system, a tolerance of not more than five
percent (5%) per axle load shall be permitted before a carrier is deemed to
have violated paragraph (c) of this subsection. The gross weight shall not
exceed eighty thousand (80,000) pounds;
(e) Except as provided for in paragraph (f) of this subsection, truck tractor,
semitrailer and trailer combinations, and other vehicle combinations may be
operated only on the interstate system and on those parts of the federal aid
highway system and the state-maintained system which have been designated
by the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet by official order as safely
allowing same; and
(f) A vehicle or combination of vehicles that is one hundred two (102) inches
wide or less and has a gross weight of not more than eighty thousand (80,000)
pounds may be driven on any state highway, for a distance of up to fifteen
(15) miles from an interstate or parkway exit.
(2) In addition to the provisions of KRS 189.2226, vehicles with a gross weight of up
to eighty thousand (80,000) pounds may travel on any state highway in the
Commonwealth without obtaining a special permit, if the weight does not exceed
any limits mandated by federal law or regulation, any posted bridge weight limit, or
the weight limits for the size and type of vehicle established under subsection (1)(c)
of this section, and if the vehicle is transporting any of the following:
Page 2 of 18
HB025810.100 - 1225 - XXXX 2/5/2026 3:04 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 258/GA
(a) Meats or agricultural crop products originating from a farm to first market;
(b) Livestock or poultry from their point of origin to first market. As used in this
paragraph and in paragraph (d) of this subsection, "livestock" means cattle,
sheep, swine, goats, horses, alpacas, llamas, buffaloes, or any other animals of
the bovine, ovine, porcine, caprine, equine, or camelid species;
(c) Primary forest products, including, but not limited to, sawdust, wood chips,
bark, slabs, or logs originating from their points of origin to first market; or
(d) Supplies, materials, or equipment necessary to carry out a farming operation
engaged in the production of agricultural crop products, meats, livestock, or
poultry.
(3) The following vehicles registered under KRS 186.050 may exceed the gross weight
provisions set forth in subsection (1)(c) of this section by a weight tolerance of ten
percent (10%), except on the interstate highway system:
(a) Vehicles that are engaged exclusively in the transportation of items listed in
subsection (2)(a), (b), and (c) of this section; and
(b) Vehicles that are engaged exclusively in the transportation of feed for
livestock or poultry.
(4) (a) Notwithstanding KRS 189.269, vehicles with a gross weight of up to ninety
thousand (90,000) pounds transporting fluid milk originating from a farm
to first market may travel on any state highway in the Commonwealth
without obtaining a special permit, except that:
1. The weight of the vehicle and load under this subsection shall not
exceed any limits mandated by federal law or regulation, or any posted
bridge weight limit; and
2. A vehicle being operated on the interstate highway system shall not
exceed eighty thousand (80,000) pounds.
(b) A vehicle may exceed the weight provisions established by this subsection by
Page 3 of 18
HB025810.100 - 1225 - XXXX 2/5/2026 3:04 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 258/GA
a weight tolerance of ten percent (10%), except on the interstate highway
system.
(5) Vehicles exclusively engaged in the transportation of motor vehicles,
unmanufactured tobacco, or unmanufactured tobacco products may, on those
highways which are a part of the state-maintained system and which have been
designated by the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet by official order as safely
allowing same, attain the maximum lengths as provided by subsection (1)(b) of this
section, excluding the usual and ordinary bumper overhang of the transported
vehicles.
(6)[(5)] Vehicles engaged exclusively in the transportation of farm or primary forestry
products and registered under KRS 186.050(4) or 186.050(9) and vehicles engaged
exclusively in the transportation of ready-mixed concrete shall be excluded from
the axle weight provisions, except on interstate highways, and subject only to total
gross weight provisions.
(7)[(6)] Vehicles registered pursuant to KRS 186.050(3)(b) and engaged in the
transportation of primary forest products, including, but not limited to, vehicles
transporting sawdust, wood chips, bark, slabs, or logs, may exceed the axle, or
gross weight provisions as set forth in accordance with subsection (1)(c) of this
section by a weight tolerance of ten percent (10%), except on the interstate highway
system.
(8)[(7)] Vehicles designed for and engaged exclusively in the collection and hauling
of refuse and registered under KRS 186.050(3)(b) shall be excluded from the axle
weight provisions, except when in operation on the federal interstate system, and
subject only to total gross weight provisions.
(9)[(8)] The secretary of the Transportation Cabinet may by order increase the weight
and height limits prescribed by this chapter for motor vehicles while being operated
exclusively on roads or highways being constructed, reconstructed, or repaired
Page 4 of 18
HB025810.100 - 1225 - XXXX 2/5/2026 3:04 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 258/GA
under contract with the Transportation Cabinet by the contractor or subcontractor,
agent, or employee thereof.
(10)[(9)] Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the secretary of the
Transportation Cabinet shall not authorize the operation of any vehicle or
combination of vehicles, upon any part of the federal aid highway system or state
parkway system, which exceeds the following dimensions and weights:
(a) Width, one hundred two (102) inches, including any part of the body or load;
or
(b) Weight, twenty thousand (20,000) pounds per single axle, with axles less than
forty-two (42) inches apart to be considered as a single axle; thirty-four
thousand (34,000) pounds on two (2) axles in tandem arrangement which are
spaced forty-two (42) inches or more apart and less than ninety-six (96)
inches apart; forty-eight thousand (48,000) pounds on three (3) axles which
are spaced forty-two (42) inches or more apart and less than one hundred
twenty (120) inches apart. The total gross weight of the vehicle and load shall
not exceed eighty thousand (80,000) pounds. If any federal law or laws or
regulations thereunder are hereafter enacted authorizing weights and
dimensions in excess of those set out in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this
subsection, the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet may by official order
increase the maximum weights and dimensions but the increased weights and
dimensions shall not exceed those set out in this section.
(11)[(10)] Except on the interstate highway system, vehicles engaged exclusively in the
transportation of crushed stone, fill dirt and rock, soil, bulk sand, coal, phosphate
muck, asphalt, concrete, solid waste, tankage or animal residues, livestock, feed for
livestock or poultry, and agricultural products shall be permitted a tolerance of ten
percent (10%) of the axle weight provisions before a carrier is deemed to have
violated subsection (1)(c) of this section.
Page 5 of 18
HB025810.100 - 1225 - XXXX 2/5/2026 3:04 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 258/GA
(12)[(11)] For any vehicle which is equipped with an auxiliary power unit, the weight
limits set forth in this section shall be increased by four hundred (400) pounds.
(13)[(12)] The Transportation Cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations in
accordance with[pursuant to] KRS Chapter 13A, relating to the implementation of
23 C.F.R. pt. 658 as it relates to state-maintained or locally maintained roads. The
enforcement of the provisions of KRS 189.221 and this section on locally
maintained roads shall not be the responsibility of the law enforcement officers of
the Transportation Cabinet, unless the head of the corresponding local government
unit has requested, in writing, enforcement assistance from the Transportation
Cabinet.
Section 2. KRS 189.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Department" means the Department of Highways;
(2) "Crosswalk" means:
(a) That part of a roadway at an intersection within the connections of the lateral
lines of the sidewalks on opposite sides of the highway measured from the
curbs or in the absence of curbs, from the edges of the traversable roadway; or
(b) Any portion of a roadway at an intersection or elsewhere distinctly indicated
for pedestrian crossing by lines or other markings on the surface;
(3) "Highway" means any public road, street, avenue, alley or boulevard, bridge,
viaduct, or trestle and the approaches to them and includes private residential roads
and parking lots covered by an agreement under KRS 61.362, off-street parking
facilities offered for public use, whether publicly or privately owned, except for-
hire parking facilities listed in KRS 189.700;
(4) "Intersection" means:
(a) The area embraced within the prolongation or connection of the lateral curb
lines, or, if none, then the lateral boundary lines of the roadways of two (2)
Page 6 of 18
HB025810.100 - 1225 - XXXX 2/5/2026 3:04 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 258/GA
highways which join one another, but do not necessarily continue, at
approximately right angles, or the area within which vehicles traveling upon
different highways joining at any other angle may come into conflict; or
(b) Where a highway includes two (2) roadways thirty (30) feet or more apart,
then every crossing of each roadway of such divided highway by an
intersecting highway shall be regarded as a separate intersection. If the
intersecting highway also includes two (2) roadways thirty (30) feet or more
apart, every crossing of two (2) roadways of the highways shall be regarded as
a separate intersection. The junction of a private alley with a public street or
highway shall not constitute an intersection;
(5) "Manufactured home" has the same meaning as defined in KRS 186.650;
(6) "Motor truck" means any motor-propelled vehicle designed for carrying freight or
merchandise. It shall not include self-propelled vehicles designed primarily for
passenger transportation but equipped with frames, racks, or bodies having a load
capacity of not exceeding one thousand (1,000) pounds;
(7) "Operator" means the person in actual physical control of a vehicle;
(8) "Pedestrian" means any person afoot or in a wheelchair;
(9) "Right-of-way" means the right of one (1) vehicle or pedestrian to proceed in a
lawful manner in preference to another vehicle or pedestrian approaching under
such circumstances of direction, speed, and proximity as to give rise to danger of
collision unless one grants precedence to the other;
(10) "Roadway" means that portion of a highway improved, designed, or ordinarily used
for vehicular travel, exclusive of the berm or shoulder. If a highway includes two
(2) or more separate roadways, the term "roadway" as used herein shall refer to any
roadway separately but not to all such roadways collectively;
(11) "Safety zone" means the area or space officially set apart within a roadway for the
exclusive use of pedestrians and which is protected or is so marked or indicated by
Page 7 of 18
HB025810.100 - 1225 - XXXX 2/5/2026 3:04 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 258/GA
adequate signs as to be plainly visible at all times while set apart as a safety zone;
(12) "Semitrailer" means a vehicle designed to be attached to, and having its front end
supported by, a motor truck or truck tractor, intended for the carrying of freight or
merchandise and having a load capacity of over one thousand (1,000) pounds;
(13) "Truck tractor" means any motor-propelled vehicle designed to draw and to support
the front end of a semitrailer. The semitrailer and the truck tractor shall be
considered to be one (1) unit;
(14) "Sharp curve" means a curve of not less than thirty (30) degrees;
(15) "State Police" includes any agency for the enforcement of the highway laws
established pursuant to law;
(16) "Steep grade" means a grade exceeding seven percent (7%);
(17) "Trailer" means any vehicle designed to be drawn by a motor truck or truck-tractor,
but supported wholly upon its own wheels, intended for the carriage of freight or
merchandise and having a load capacity of over one thousand (1,000) pounds;
(18) "Unobstructed highway" means a straight, level, first-class road upon which no
other vehicle is passing or attempting to pass and upon which no other vehicle or
pedestrian is approaching in the opposite direction, closer than three hundred (300)
yards;
(19) (a) "Vehicle" includes:
1. All agencies for the transportation of persons or property over or upon
the public highways of the Commonwealth; and
2. All vehicles passing over or upon the highways.
(b) "Motor vehicle" includes all vehicles, as defined in paragraph (a) of this
subsection, except:
1. Road rollers;
2. Road graders;
3. Farm tractors;
Page 8 of 18
HB025810.100 - 1225 - XXXX 2/5/2026 3:04 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 258/GA
4. Vehicles on which power shovels are mounted;
5. Construction equipment customarily used only on the site of
construction and which is not practical for the transportation of persons
or property upon the highways;
6. Vehicles that travel exclusively upon rails;
7. Vehicles propelled by electric power obtained from overhead wires
while being operated within any municipality or where the vehicles do
not travel more than five (5) miles beyond the city limits of any
municipality;
8. Vehicles propelled by muscular power; and
9. Electric low-speed scooters;
(20) "Reflectance" means the ratio of the amount of total light, expressed in a
percentage, which is reflected outward by the product or material to the amount of
total light falling on the product or material;
(21) "Sunscreening material" means a product or material, including film, glazing, and
perforated sunscreening, which, when applied to the windshield or windows of a
motor vehicle, reduces the effects of the sun with respect to light reflectance or
transmittance;
(22) "Transmittance" means the ratio of the amount of total light, expressed in a
percentage, which is allowed to pass through the product or material, including
glazing, to the amount of total light falling on the product or material and the
glazing;
(23) "Window" means any device designed for exterior viewing from a motor vehicle,
except the windshield, any roof-mounted viewing device, and any viewing device
having less than one hundred fifty (150) square inches in area;
(24) "All-terrain vehicle" means any motor vehicle used for recreational off-road use;
(25) "Nondivisible load," as pertains to:
Page 9 of 18
HB025810.100 - 1225 - XXXX 2/5/2026 3:04 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 258/GA
(a) State highways that are not part of the national truck network established
pursuant to 23 C.F.R. pt. 658, means a load or vehicle, that if separated into
smaller loads or vehicles:
1.[(a)] Compromises the intended use of the vehicle, making it unable to
perform the function for which it was intended;
2.[(b)] Destroys the value of the load or vehicle, making it unusable for
its intended purpose; or
3.[(c)] Requires more than four (4) work hours to dismantle and
reassemble using appropriate equipment; or
(b) Any highway that is part of the national truck network established pursuant
to 23 C.F.R. pt. 658, includes fluid milk products in accordance with 23
U.S.C. sec. 127(a)(13);
(26) "Electric low-speed scooter" means a device that:
(a) Weighs less than one hundred (100) pounds;
(b) Is equipped with wheels;
(c) Is equipped with handlebars;
(d) Is equipped with a brake adequate enough to stop and park the device;
(e) Is designed to be stood or sat upon;
(f) Is propelled by an electric motor, human power, or both; and
(g) Is designed to operate at a maximum speed of twenty (20) miles per hour, on a
paved level surface, with or without human propulsion; and
(27) "Highway work zone" means that portion of a highway and the affected area
adjacent to a lane, berm, or shoulder, including a sidewalk, upon which
construction, reconstruction, resurfacing, maintenance, inspection, or other work of
that nature is being conducted by a government agency, private contractor, or utility
company.
Section 3. KRS 189.270 is amended to read as follows:
Page 10 of 18
HB025810.100 - 1225 - XXXX 2/5/2026 3:04 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 258/GA
(1) (a) The department may issue permits for the operation of motor vehicles,
manufactured homes, recreational vehicles, boats, or any other vehicle
transporting a nondivisible load, whose gross weight including load, height,
width, or length exceeds the limits prescribed by this chapter or which in other
respects fail to comply with the requirements of this chapter. Permits may be
issued by the department for stated periods, special purposes, and unusual
conditions, and upon terms in the interest of public safety and the preservation
of the highways as the department may require.
(b) Subject to the limitations in subsection (4) of this section, the department shall
promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A
to set fees for permits established under this section.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (8) of this section, the department may, at the
request of an applicant, issue a single-trip permit regardless of the type of vehicle or
equipment being transported that exceeds the weight or dimension limits
established by this chapter if the load being transported is a nondivisible load.
(3) (a) Except as provided in subsection (8) of this section, the department may, at
the request of an applicant, issue an annual permit regardless of the type of
vehicle or equipment being transported that exceeds the weight or dimension
limits established by this chapter if the load being transported is a nondivisible
load.
(b) Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection, a[The] vehicle
operating under a permit issued under this subsection shall not exceed sixteen
(16) feet in width exclusive of usual and ordinary overhang, one hundred
twenty (120) feet in length including a towing vehicle and trailer combination,
thirteen (13) feet six (6) inches in height, or one hundred sixty thousand
(160,000) pounds.
(c) Notwithstanding KRS 189.269, a vehicle transporting fluid milk products
Page 11 of 18
HB025810.100 - 1225 - XXXX 2/5/2026 3:04 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 258/GA
under a permit issued under this subsection shall not exceed one hundred
thousand (100,000) pounds.
(4) The department shall establish the following annual permits to transport farm
equipment, with the listed fee limits:
(a) For equipment less than or equal to fourteen (14) feet in width, eighty dollars
($80); and
(b) For equipment that exceeds fourteen (14) feet in width, when transported from
a dealership to a farm, from a farm to a dealership, or from a dealership to a
dealership, one hundred fifty dollars ($150).
(5) Permits issued under this section shall be for nondivisible loads and shall be valid
statewide; however, the department may, as a condition of issuing an annual or
single-trip permit, limit the overweight or overdimensional vehicle to specified
routes, exclude certain highways, or even cancel an applicant's permit if an
unreasonable risk of accident or an unreasonable impedance of the flow of traffic
would result from the presence of the overweight or overdimensional vehicle. A
person who applies for, and accepts, a permit issued under this section is
acknowledging that the Kentucky Transportation Cabinet is not guaranteeing safe
passage of vehicles by issuing the permit. A person who applies for, and accepts, a
permit issued under this section agrees to measure all clearances of highway
structures, both laterally and vertically, prior to passage of the person's vehicles
along the routes specified in the permit. A person who applies for, and accepts, a
permit issued under this section is classified as a bare licensee whose duty is to
assume sole risk involved in using Kentucky's highways without warranty of
accuracy.
(6) Subject to the limitations of subsection (12) of this section, the department shall
promulgate administrative regulations under KRS Chapter 13A to establish
requirements for escort vehicles, safety markings, and other safety restrictions
Page 12 of 18
HB025810.100 - 1225 - XXXX 2/5/2026 3:04 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 258/GA
governing the operation of an overweight or overdimensional vehicle. The
department shall provide each applicant for an annual or single-trip permit issued
under this section a copy of all restrictions associated with the overweight or
overdimensional permit at no charge to the applicant. The department shall be
prohibited from raising the permit fee established in subsections (2) and (3) of this
section by levying additional fees for an overweight or overdimensional permit
through the administrative regulation process.
(7) (a) Notwithstanding KRS 189.269, the department may, at the request of an
applicant who is a transporter of manufactured housing, issue an annual
permit that exceeds the weight or dimension limits established by this chapter
if the load being transported is a nondivisible load.
(b) The vehicle operated shall not exceed sixteen (16) feet in width exclusive of
usual and ordinary overhang, one hundred twenty (120) feet in length
including a towing vehicle and trailer combination, fifteen (15) feet in height,
or one hundred sixty thousand (160,000) pounds.
(c) The holder of a permit issued under this subsection shall, when transporting a
manufactured home:
1. Abide by all escort requirements, safety markings, and other safety
restrictions governing overweight and overdimensional vehicles; and
2. Equip each truck operating under a permit with global positioning
system technology that keeps a record of locations traveled. The travel
records of trucks operating under a permit shall be open to inspection by
the Transportation Cabinet.
(d) Any person with a permit under this subsection who operates a vehicle greater
than thirteen (13) feet six (6) inches in height while operating in a restricted
area designated by the Transportation Cabinet shall be fined one thousand
dollars ($1,000).
Page 13 of 18
HB025810.100 - 1225 - XXXX 2/5/2026 3:04 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 258/GA
(8) The cabinet shall not issue an annual permit under this section if the person
applying for the permit is eligible for an annual permit issued under KRS 189.2716
or 189.2717.
(9) The department may require the applicant to give bond, with approved surety, to
indemnify the state or counties against damage to highways or bridges resulting
from use by the applicant. The operation of vehicles in accordance with the terms of
the permit issued under this section shall not constitute a violation of this chapter if
the operator has the permit, or an authenticated copy of it, in his or her possession.
(10) Any person transporting a parade float which exceeds the dimensional limits on a
highway over which it is transported shall be required to obtain a permit as required
in subsection (2) of this section. If the float is being used in conjunction with a
parade to be held within the boundaries of the Commonwealth, a fee shall not be
assessed by the department to issue the permit.
(11) A person shall not operate any vehicle in violation of the terms of the permit issued
under this section.
(12) (a) The cabinet shall not promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to this
section that restrict the time or days of the week when a permit holder may
operate on the highway, except that travel may be limited from 6 a.m. to 9
a.m. and 3 p.m. to 6 p.m. Monday through Friday. In addition to the
restrictions established in this paragraph, any manufactured home being
transported by permit issued under this section shall not travel on any
highway after daylight hours Monday through Saturday, or at any time on
Sunday.
(b) The cabinet shall allow a permit holder who has obtained a permit to transport
equipment to a work site to return to the permit holder's place of business
immediately after work is completed at the job site, subject to the limitations
of paragraph (a) of this subsection.
Page 14 of 18
HB025810.100 - 1225 - XXXX 2/5/2026 3:04 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 258/GA
(c) The cabinet shall not promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to this
section setting forth escort vehicle requirements for overdimensional farm
implements or vehicles towing overdimensional farm implements that are
more stringent than the following:
1. For a single vehicle and load in excess of twelve (12) feet in width being
operated on a two (2) lane highway, no more than one (1) lead vehicle
shall be required;
2. For a single vehicle and load in excess of twelve (12) feet in width being
operated on a four (4) lane highway, no more than one (1) trail vehicle
shall be required;
3. For a single vehicle and load in excess of eighty-five (85) feet in length
being operated on a two (2) lane highway, no more than one (1) lead
vehicle shall be required;
4. For more than one (1) vehicle and load in excess of twelve (12) feet in
width or eighty-five (85) feet in length being operated as a convoy on a
two (2) lane highway, no more than one (1) lead vehicle shall be
required;
5. A lead escort vehicle on a two (2) lane highway under this paragraph
may also serve as a tow vehicle;
6. Any distance for lead or trail escort vehicles shall contain provisions
allowing for a variance from that distance due to safety or road
conditions; and
7. A vehicle or its escort shall be required to bear a sign declaring that the
vehicle is oversized or be required to use lights, flashers, or flags, but a
vehicle or its escort shall not be required to do both.
Section 4. KRS 189.2717 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Subject to the provisions of KRS 189.222, the department may promulgate
Page 15 of 18
HB025810.100 - 1225 - XXXX 2/5/2026 3:04 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 258/GA
administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A governing the
issuance of annual permits for the operation of motor vehicles transporting
nondivisible loads in this Commonwealth whose gross weight exceeds the
limits prescribed by this chapter.
(b) Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection, the gross weight of a
motor vehicle operating pursuant to this section shall not exceed one hundred
twenty thousand (120,000) pounds.
(c) Notwithstanding KRS 189.269, the gross weight of a motor vehicle
transporting fluid milk products under a permit issued under this section
shall not exceed one hundred thousand (100,000) pounds.
(d) The movement of the overweight motor vehicle shall be limited to a specific
route set forth on the annual permit.
(2) Except as provided is subsection (3) of this section, the following axle weights
shall not be exceeded in the loading of a nondivisible load:
(a) Single axle with axles less than forty-two (42) inches apart and being the
steering axle with one (1) wheel on each side of the axle to be considered a
single axle shall not be more than fifteen thousand (15,000) pounds;
(b) Two (2) axles in tandem arrangement which are spaced forty-two (42) inches
or more apart and less than ninety-six (96) inches apart shall not be more than
forty thousand (40,000) pounds;
(c) Three (3) axles in tridem arrangement which are spaced forty-two (42) or
more inches apart and less than one hundred twenty (120) inches apart shall
not be more than sixty-five thousand (65,000) pounds; and
(d) Dual wheel axle with one (1) axle with two (2) wheels on each side of the axle
to be considered a dual wheel axle shall not be more than twenty thousand
(20,000) pounds each.
(3) Notwithstanding KRS 189.269, the axle weight limits in subsection (2) of this
Page 16 of 18
HB025810.100 - 1225 - XXXX 2/5/2026 3:04 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 258/GA
section shall not apply to a vehicle transporting fluid milk products under a
permit issued under this section.
(4) Each motor vehicle operating pursuant to this section shall comply with the safety
provisions set forth in the administrative regulations promulgated by the department
pursuant to this section.
(5)[(4)] The department shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance
with KRS Chapter 13A to set fees for permits established under this section.
(6)[(5)] The department may refuse to issue a permit for a requested route because of
the inadequacies of the roadway or a structure on that route.
Section 5. KRS 189.221 is amended to read as follows:
A person shall not operate on any highway, except those highways designated by the
secretary of transportation under the provisions of KRS 189.222, or those locally
maintained highways under the provisions of KRS 189.222(13)[(12)] or 189.230(4), any
of the following trucks, trailers, manufactured homes, or vehicles:
(1) Any motor truck, semitrailer, trailer, manufactured home, or vehicle which exceeds
eleven and one-half (11-1/2) feet in height or ninety-six (96) inches in width,
including any part of the body or load;
(2) Any motor truck, except a semitrailer truck, which exceeds twenty-six and one half
(26-1/2) feet in length, including any part of the body or load;
(3) Any semitrailer truck which exceeds thirty (30) feet in length, including any part of
the body or load;
(4) Any truck, semitrailer truck, or truck and trailer unit which exceeds 36,000 pounds
gross weight, including the load;
(5) Any truck, semitrailer truck, or tractor-trailer unit which exceeds a gross weight
equal to the sum of six hundred (600) pounds per inch of the combined width of the
tires upon which the vehicle may be propelled, but no more than thirty-six thousand
(36,000) pounds; and
Page 17 of 18
HB025810.100 - 1225 - XXXX 2/5/2026 3:04 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 258/GA
(6) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, any truck hauling building materials
under KRS 189.2226, or to a road construction project on a highway rated less than
the maximum weight provided above, may haul up to eighty thousand (80,000)
pounds gross weight, including the load, without a permit.
Page 18 of 18
HB025810.100 - 1225 - XXXX 2/5/2026 3:04 PM GA